Massachusetts, session 194th, H4493.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following new section:- 
Section 226A Contracts for Community Pharmacy Services  
“Brand name drug”, a drug that is: (i) produced or distributed pursuant to an original new 
drug application approved under 21 U.S.C. 355(c) except for: (A) any drug approved through an 
application submitted under section 505(b)(2) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act that 
is pharmaceutically equivalent, as that term is defined by the United States Food and Drug 
Administration, to a drug approved under 21 U.S.C. 355(c); (B) an abbreviated new drug 407 
application that was approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services 
under section 505(c) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 355(c), before the 
date of the enactment of the federal Drug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 
19 of 58 1984, Public Law 98-417, 98 Stat. 1585; or (C) an authorized generic drug as defined in 
42 C.F.R. 447.502; (ii) produced or distributed pursuant to a biologics license application 

of 8 14 approved 412 under 42 U.S.C. 262(a)(2)(C); or (iii) identified by the health benefit plan as a 
brand name drug based on available data resources such as Medi-Span.  
“Generic drug”, a retail drug that is: (i) marketed or distributed pursuant to an 
abbreviated new drug application approved under 21 U.S.C. 355(j); (ii) an authorized generic 
drug as defined in 42 C.F.R. 447.502; (iii) a drug that entered the market before January 1, 1962 
and was not originally marketed under a new drug application; or (iv) identified by the health 
benefit plan as a generic drug based on available data resources such as Medi-Span.  
“Pharmacy Audit”, a process that involves the inspection of pharmacy records to ensure 
high quality services and the lack of Fraud Waste, and Abuse. This includes desk audits as well 
as in-person audits.  
“Pharmacy Benefit Manager” as defined in MGL c 175 Section 226 (a).  
Pharmacy Steering” A practice employed by a pharmacy benefit manager or carrier that 
channels a prescription to a pharmacy in which a pharmacy benefit manager or carrier has an 
ownership interest, and includes and is not limited to retail, mail order, or specialty pharmacy.  
“Specialty Medications” medications that have a complex profile that require intensive 
patient management or special handling.  
Section 1: Network Pharmacies and Payment for pharmacy services  
A contract for pharmacy services between a pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy 
must include an ingredient cost that meets the criteria in section 3E and a dispensing fee equal be 
no less than what is paid by the State Medicaid Program.  Payment for clean claims must include 

of 8 34 all applicable discounts.  Contracts that include retroactive discounts and use “Generic Effective 
Rate” or “Brand Effective Rate” or any other similar retroactive rate reductions are prohibited.  
Payment for pharmacy services to non-affiliated pharmacies must be equal to or greater 
than payment to pharmacies affiliated with or owned by the pharmacy benefit manager.    
A pharmacy benefit manager shall not engage in pharmacy steering.  
A pharmacy benefit manager must allow any pharmacy licensed in Massachusetts to 
provide any medication including “specialty medications” if the pharmacy is willing to provide 
the required services.  The required services must be the same among all pharmacies.  
Requirements to provide specialty pharmacy medications cannot be designed to exclude 
community pharmacies  
Section 2: Ingredient and Maximum Allowable Cost  
(a) For the purposes of this section the term "maximum allowable cost list" shall mean a 
list of drugs, medical products or devices, or both medical products and devices, for which a 
maximum allowable cost has been established by a pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity. 
The term "maximum allowable cost" shall mean the maximum amount that a pharmacy benefits 
manager or covered entity will reimburse a pharmacy for the cost of a drug or a medical product 
or device inclusive of all discounts when the claim is processed or taken retroactively.  
(b) The maxim allowable cost (if used) or the ingredient cost (if not used) must be equal 
to or greater than the cost used by the Massachusetts Medicaid Program  

of 8 53  (c) The maximum allowable cost for non-affiliated pharmacies must be equal to or 
greater than the maximum allowable cost to pharmacies affiliated with or owned by the 
pharmacy benefit manager.    
(d) Before a pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity may place a drug on a 
maximum allowable cost list the drug must be listed as "A" or "AB" rated in the most recent 
version of the FDA's Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations, also 
known as the Orange Book, or has an "NR" or "NA" rating or a similar rating by a nationally 
recognized reference; and that there are at least two therapeutically equivalent, multiple source 
drugs, or at least one generic drug available from one manufacturer, available for purchase by 
network pharmacies from national or regional wholesalers registered in Massachusetts.  
(e) A pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity shall make available to each 
pharmacy with which the pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity has a contract and to 
each pharmacy included in a network of pharmacies served by a pharmacy services 
administrative organization with which the pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity has a 
contract, at the beginning of the term of a contract upon renewal of a contract, or upon request:  
(1) The sources used to determine the maximum allowable costs for the drugs and 
medical products and devices on each maximum allowable cost list;  
(2) Every maximum allowable cost for individual drugs used by that pharmacy benefits 
manager or covered entity for patients served by that contracted pharmacy; and  
(3) Upon request, every maximum allowable cost list used by that pharmacy benefits 
manager or covered entity for patients served by that contracted pharmacy.  

of 8 74    
(e) A pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity shall:  
(1) update each maximum allowable cost list at least every 3 business days  
(2) Make the updated lists available to every pharmacy with which the pharmacy benefits 
manager or covered entity has a contract and to every pharmacy included in a network of 
pharmacies served by a pharmacy services administrative organization with which the pharmacy 
benefits manager or covered entity has a contract, in a readily accessible, secure and usable web-
based format or other comparable format or process; and  
(3) Utilize the updated maximum allowable costs to calculate the payments made to the 
contracted pharmacies within 2 business days.  
(f) A pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity shall establish a clearly defined 
process through which a pharmacy may contest the cost for a particular drug or medical product 
or device.  
(g) A pharmacy may base its appeal on one or more of the following:  
(1) The ingredient cost established for a particular drug or medical product, or device is 
below the cost used by the Massachusetts Medicaid Program  
(2) The pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity has placed a drug on the maximum 
allowable cost list that does not meet the requirements of subsection (d).  
(h) The pharmacy must file its appeal within seven business days of its submission of the 
initial claim for reimbursement for the drug or medical product or device. A Pharmacy Services 

of 8 94 Administrative Organization (PSAO) may appeal on behalf of a pharmacy or group of 
pharmacies. The pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity must make a final determination 
resolving the pharmacy's appeal within seven business days of the pharmacy benefits manager or 
covered entity's receipt of the appeal.  
(i) If the final determination is a denial of the pharmacy's appeal, the pharmacy benefits 
manager or covered entity must state the reason for the denial and provide the national drug code 
100 of an equivalent drug that is generally available for purchase by pharmacies in this state from 
101 national or regional wholesalers licensed by the state at a price which is equal to or less than the  
102 cost for that drug.  
103  (j) If a pharmacy's appeal is determined to be valid by the pharmacy benefits manager or 
104 covered entity, the pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity shall retroactively adjust the 
105 cost of the drug or medical product or device and reprocess all claims that were paid incorrectly. 
106 The adjustment shall be effective from the date the pharmacy's appeal was filed, and the 
107 pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity shall provide reimbursement for all reprocessed 
108 claims.  
109  (k) Once a pharmacy's appeal is determined to be valid by the pharmacy benefits manager 
110 or covered entity, the pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity shall adjust the cost of the 
111 drug or medical product or device for all similar pharmacies in the network as determined by the 
112 pharmacy benefits manager within 3 business days.  
113  (l) A pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity shall make available on its secure web 
114 site information about the appeals process, including, but not limited to, a telephone number or 
115 process that a pharmacy may use to submit cost appeals. The medical products and devices 

of 8 116 subject to the requirements of this part are limited to the medical products and devices included 
117 as a pharmacy benefit under the pharmacy benefits contract.  
118  (m) A pharmacy shall not disclose to any third party the cost lists and any related 
119 information it receives from a pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity; provided, a 
120 pharmacy may share such lists and related information with a pharmacy services administrative 
121 organization or similar entity with which the pharmacy has a contract to provide administrative 
122 services for that pharmacy. If a pharmacy shares this information with a pharmacy services 
123 administrative organization or similar entity, that organization or entity shall not disclose the 
124 information to any third party.  
125  (n) If a generic medication is readily available from a wholesaler licensed in 
126 Massachusetts, a pharmacy benefit manager is prohibited from requiring the brand name be used 
127 or giving any financial incentive to a pharmacy or patient to use the brand name product.  The 
128 Massachusetts Medicaid program is exempt from this requirement.  
129  (o) Pharmacy Benefit Managers shall provide annually a report to the Commissioner that 
130 details all denied pharmacy appeals for that year to include: the name of the pharmacy, date of 
131 service for the claim, the drug name and billing code used on the claim, the amount billed, the 
132 amount paid, and the reason for the denial.  
133  Section 3: If during a pharmacy audit, the pharmacy can use signature logs or statements 
134 from the prescriber obtained after the audit to validate the intent of a prescription or medication 
135 order.  If the pharmacy provided the intended medication to the patient but there was a clerical 
136 error (with no financial or clinical impact), the pharmacy benefit manager is prohibited from 

of 8 137 recouping the ingredient cost and can only recoup the dispensing fee. All revenue from 
138 pharmacy audits must be given to the plan sponsor.  
139  Section 4: A pharmacy benefit manager is prohibited from charging a community 
140 pharmacy for credentialing.   
141  Section 5: The Insurance Commissioner shall enforce this act and shall promulgate 
142 regulations to enforce the provisions of this act. The commissioner may examine or audit the 
143 books and records of a pharmacy benefits manager providing claims processing services or other 
144 prescription drug or device services for a health benefit plan to determine if the pharmacy 
145 benefits manager is in compliance with this act.  The information or data acquired during an 
146 examination is:  
147  (a) Considered proprietary and confidential; and  
148  (b) Not subject to the Freedom of Information Act of Massachusetts.